North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 23. State Education Assistance.
§ 116-209.3.
Additional powers.

The Authority is authorized to develop and administer programs and perform all functions necessary or convenient to promote and facilitate the making and insuring of student loans and providing such other student loan assistance and services as the Authority shall deem necessary or desirable for carrying out the purposes of this Article and for qualifying for loans, grants, insurance and other benefits and assistance under any program of the United States now or hereafter authorized fostering student loans. There shall be established and maintained a trust fund which shall be designated “State Education Assistance Authority Loan Fund” (the “Loan Fund”) which may be used by the Authority in making student loans directly or through agents or independent contractors, insuring student loans, acquiring, purchasing, endorsing or guaranteeing promissory notes, contracts, obligations or other legal instruments evidencing student loans made by banks, educational institutions, nonprofit corporations or other eligible lenders, and for defraying the expenses of operation and administration of the Authority for which other funds are not available to the Authority. There shall be deposited to the credit of such Loan Fund the proceeds (exclusive of accrued interest) derived from the sale of its revenue bonds by the Authority and any other moneys made available to the Authority for the making or insuring of student loans or the purchase of obligations. There shall also be deposited to the credit of the Loan Fund surplus funds from time to time transferred by the Authority from the sinking fund. Such Loan Fund shall be maintained as a revolving fund. There is also deposited to the credit of the Loan Fund the income derived from the investment or deposit of the Escheat Fund distributed to the Authority pursuant to

G.S. 116B-7

. The income shall be held, administered and applied by the Authority as provided in any resolution adopted or trust agreement approved by the Authority, subject to the provisions of Chapter 116B of the General Statutes and this Article.

In lieu of or in addition to the Loan Fund, the Authority may provide in any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds or any trust agreement securing such bonds that any other trust funds or accounts may be established as may be deemed necessary or convenient for securing the bonds or for making student loans, acquiring obligations or otherwise carrying out its other powers under this Article, and there may be deposited to the credit of any such fund or account proceeds of bonds or other money available to the Authority for the purposes to be served by such fund or account.

History.

1967, c. 1177; 1971, c. 392, s. 4; 1979, c. 165, s. 5; 1987, c. 227, s. 6; 1999-460, s. 12.

§ 116-209.4.
Authority to issue bonds.

The Authority is hereby authorized to provide for the issuance, at one time or from time to time, of revenue bonds of the Authority in such principal amounts as the Board of Directors shall determine to be necessary. The bonds shall be designated, subject to such additions or changes as the Authority deems advisable, “State Education Assistance Authority Revenue Bonds, Series
_______________ ,” inserting in the blank space a letter identifying the particular series of bonds.

The principal of and the interest on such bonds shall be payable solely from the funds herein provided for such payment. The bonds of each issue shall be dated, shall bear interest at such rate or rates, shall mature at such time or times not exceeding 30 years from their date or dates, as may be determined by the Authority, and may be made redeemable before maturity, at the option of the Authority, at such price or prices and under such terms and conditions as may be fixed by the Authority prior to the issuance of the bonds. Prior to the preparation of definitive bonds, the Authority may, under like restrictions, issue interim receipts or temporary bonds, with or without coupons, exchangeable for definitive bonds when such bonds shall have been executed and are available for delivery. The Authority may also provide for the replacement of any bonds which shall become mutilated or shall be destroyed or lost. The Authority shall determine the form and the manner of execution of the bonds, including any interest coupons to be attached thereto, and shall fix the denomination or denominations of the bonds and the place or places of payment of principal and interest, which may be at any bank or trust company within or without the State. In case any officer whose signature or a facsimile of whose signature shall appear on any bonds or coupons shall cease to be such officer before the delivery of such bonds, such signature or such facsimile shall nevertheless be valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if he had remained in office until such delivery. The Authority may also provide for the authentication of the bonds by a fiscal agent. The bonds may be issued in coupon or in registered form, or both, as the Authority may determine, and provision may be made for the registration of any coupon bonds as to principal alone and also as to both principal and interest, and for the reconversion into coupon bonds of any bonds registered as to both principal and interest, and for the interchange of registered and coupon bonds. The Authority may sell such bonds in such manner, either at public or private sale, and for such price as it may determine will best effectuate the purposes of this Article.

The Authority is authorized to provide in any resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds for pledging or assigning as security for its revenue bonds, subject to any prior pledge or assignment, and for deposit to the credit of the sinking fund, any or all of its income, receipts, funds or other assets, exclusive of bond proceeds and other funds required to be deposited to the credit of the Loan Fund, of whatsoever kind from time to time acquired or owned by the Authority, including all donations, grants and other money or property made available to it, payments received on student loans, such as principal, interest and penalties, if any, premiums on student loan insurance, fees, charges and other income derived from services rendered or otherwise, proceeds of property or insurance, earnings and profits on investments of funds and from sales, purchases, endorsements or guarantees of obligations, as defined in

G.S. 116-201

hereof, and other securities and instruments, contract rights, any funds, rights, insurance or other benefits acquired pursuant to any federal law or contract to the extent not in conflict therewith, money recovered through the enforcement of any remedies or rights, and any other funds or things of value which in the determination of the Authority may enhance the marketability of its revenue bonds. Money in the sinking fund shall be disbursed in such manner and under such restrictions as the Authority may provide in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds. Unless otherwise provided in the bond resolution, the revenue bonds at any time issued hereunder shall be entitled to payment from the sinking fund without preference or priority of the bonds first issued. Bonds may be issued under the provisions of this Article without obtaining, except as otherwise expressly provided in this Article, the consent of any department, division, commission, board, body, bureau or agency of the State, and without any other proceedings or the happening of any conditions or things other than those proceedings, conditions or things which are specifically required by this Article and the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds.

The Authority is authorized to provide by resolution or in any trust agreement for the issuance of revenue refunding bonds of the Authority for the purpose of refunding, or advance refunding and paying, any bonds then outstanding, which have been issued under the provisions of this Article, including the payment of any redemption premium and of any interest accrued or to accrue up to the date of redemption of the bonds, and, if deemed advisable by the Authority, for making student loans or acquiring obligations under this Article. The issuance of the revenue refunding bonds, the maturities and other details, the rights of the holders and the rights, duties and obligations of the Authority, shall be governed by the appropriate provisions of this Article relating to the issuance of revenue bonds. Revenue refunding bonds issued under this section may be sold or exchanged for outstanding bonds issued under this Article. If sold, in addition to any other authorized purpose, the proceeds may be deposited in an escrow or other trust fund and invested, in whole or in part, and with the earnings from the investments, may be applied to the purchase or to the redemption prior to, or to payment at maturity, of outstanding bonds, all as provided by resolution or in trust agreement securing the bonds.

History.

1967, c. 1177; 1971, c. 392, ss. 5-7; 1979, c. 165, s. 6.

§ 116-209.5.
Bond resolution.

The resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the bondholders as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the Authority in relation to the purchase or sale of obligations, the making of student loans, the insurance of student loans, the fees, charges and premiums to be fixed and collected, the terms and conditions for the issuance of additional bonds and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the State which may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds, revenues or other money hereunder to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the Authority. Any such resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of administering this Article and may be payable, together with other expenses of operation and administration under this Article incurred by the Authority, from the Loan Fund.

In the discretion of the Authority, any bonds issued under the provisions of this Article may be secured by a trust agreement by and between the Authority and a corporate trustee, which may be any trust company or bank having powers of a trust company within or without the State. Such trust agreement or the resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may pledge or assign the fees, penalties, charges, proceeds from collections, grants, subsidies, donations and other funds and revenues to be received therefor. Such trust agreement or resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds may contain such provisions for protecting and enforcing the rights and remedies of the holders of such bonds as may be reasonable and proper and not in violation of law, including covenants setting forth the duties of the Authority in relation to student loans, the acquisition of obligations, insurance, the fees, penalties and other charges to be fixed and collected, the sale or purchase of obligations or any part thereof, or other property, the terms and conditions for the issuance of additional bonds, and the custody, safeguarding and application of all moneys. It shall be lawful for any bank or trust company incorporated under the laws of the State which may act as depositary of the proceeds of bonds, revenues or other money hereunder to furnish such indemnifying bonds or to pledge such securities as may be required by the Authority. Any such trust agreement or resolution may set forth the rights and remedies of the bondholders and of the trustee, and may restrict the individual right of action by bondholders. In addition to the foregoing, any such trust agreement or resolution may contain such other provisions as the Authority may deem reasonable and proper for the security of the bondholders. All expenses incurred in carrying out the provisions of such trust agreement or resolution may be treated as a part of the cost of carrying out the purposes for which such bonds shall be issued.

In addition to all other powers granted to the Authority by this Article, the Authority is hereby authorized to pledge to the payment of the principal of and the interest on any bonds under the provisions of this Article any moneys received or to be received by it under any appropriation made to it by the General Assembly, unless the appropriation is restricted by the General Assembly to specific purposes of the Authority or such pledge is prohibited by the law making such appropriation; provided, however, that nothing herein shall be construed to obligate the General Assembly to make any such appropriation.

History.

1967, c. 1177; 1971, c. 392, s. 8.

§ 116-209.6.
Revenues.

The Authority is authorized to fix and collect fees, charges, interest and premiums for making or insuring student loans, purchasing, endorsing or guaranteeing obligations and any other services performed under this Article. The Authority is further authorized to contract with the United States of America or any agency or officer thereof and with any person, partnership, association, banking institution or other corporation respecting the carrying out of the Authority’s functions under this Article. The Authority shall at all times endeavor to fix and collect such fees, charges, receipts, premiums and other income so as to have available in the sinking fund at all times an amount which, together with any other funds made available therefor, shall be sufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and payable and to create reserves for such purposes. Money in the sinking fund, except such part thereof as may be necessary to provide such reserves for the bonds as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, shall be set aside in the sinking fund at such regular intervals as may be provided in such resolution and is hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on such bonds as the same shall become due and the redemption price or the purchase price of bonds retired by call or purchase as therein provided. Such pledge shall be valid and binding from the time when the pledge is made. The fees, charges, receipts, proceeds and other revenues and moneys so pledged and thereafter received by the Authority shall immediately be subject to the lien of such pledge without any physical delivery thereof or further act, and the lien of any such pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract or otherwise against the Authority, irrespective of whether such parties have notice thereof. The resolution by which a pledge is created need not be filed or recorded except in the records of the Authority. The use and disposition of money to the credit of the sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds. Any such resolution may, in the discretion of the Authority, provide for the transfer of surplus money in the sinking fund to the credit of the Loan Fund. Except as may otherwise be provided in such resolution, such sinking fund shall be a fund for all such bonds without distinction or priority of one over another.

History.

1967, c. 1177.

Cross References.

For additional powers of the State Education Assistance Authority, see

G.S. 116-209.3

.

§ 116-209.7.
Trust funds.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, all money received pursuant to the authority of the Article, whether as proceeds from the sale of bonds, sale of property or insurance, or as payments of student loans, whether principal, interest or penalties, if any, thereon, or as insurance premiums, or from the purchase or sale of obligations, or as any other receipts or revenues derived hereunder, shall be deemed to be trust funds to be held and applied solely as provided in this Article. The resolution authorizing the bonds of any issue may provide that any of such money may be temporarily invested pending the disbursement thereof and shall provide that any officer with whom, or any bank or trust company with which, such money shall be deposited shall act as trustee of such money and shall hold and apply the same for the purposes hereof, subject to such regulations as this Article and such resolution may provide.

History.

1967, c. 1177.

§ 116-209.8.
Remedies.

Any holder of bonds issued under the provisions of this Article or any of the coupons appertaining thereto, except to the extent the rights herein given may be restricted by such resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, may either at law or in equity, by suit, action, mandamus or other proceeding, protect and enforce any and all rights under the laws of the State or granted hereunder or under such resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds, or under any contract executed by the Authority pursuant to this Article, and may enforce and compel the performance of all duties required by this Article or by such resolution to be performed by the Authority or by any officer thereof, including the fixing, charging and collecting of fees, charges and premiums and the collection of principal, interest and penalties, if any, on student loans or obligations evidencing such loans. The Authority may provide in any trust agreement securing the bonds that any such rights may be enforced for and on behalf of the holders of bonds by the trustee under such trust agreement.

History.

1967, c. 1177; 1971, c. 392, s. 9.

§ 116-209.9.
Negotiability of bonds.

All bonds issued under the provisions of this Article shall have and are hereby declared to have all the qualities and incidents, including negotiability, of investment securities under the Uniform Commercial Code of the State but no provision of such Code respecting the filing of a financial statement to perfect a security interest shall be deemed applicable to or necessary for any security interest created in connection with the issuance of any such bonds.

History.

1967, c. 1177; 1971, c. 392, s. 10.

§ 116-209.10.
Bonds eligible for investment.

Bonds issued by the Authority under the provisions of this Article are hereby made securities in which all public officers and public bodies of the State and its political subdivisions, all insurance companies, trust companies, banking associations, investment companies, executors, administrators, trustees and other fiduciaries may properly and legally invest funds, including capital in their control or belonging to them. Such bonds are hereby made securities which may properly and legally be deposited with and received by any State or municipal officer or any agency or political subdivision of the State for any purpose for which the deposit of bonds or obligations of the State is now or may hereafter be authorized by law.

History.

1967, c. 1177.

§ 116-209.11.
Additional pledge.

Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary herein, the Authority is hereby authorized to pledge as security for any bonds issued hereunder any contract between the Authority and the United States of America under which the United States agrees to make funds available to the Authority for any of the purposes of this Article, to insure or guarantee the payment of interest or principal on student loans, or otherwise to aid in promoting or facilitating student loans.

History.

1967, c. 1177.

§ 116-209.12.
Credit of State not pledged.

Bonds issued under the provisions of this Article shall not be deemed to constitute a debt, liability or obligation of the State or of any political subdivision thereof or a pledge of the faith and credit of the State or of any such political subdivision, but shall be payable solely from the revenues and other funds provided therefor. Each bond issued under this Article shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the Authority shall not be obligated to pay the same nor the interest thereon except from the revenues, proceeds and other funds pledged therefor and that neither the faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State or of any political subdivision thereof is pledged to the payment of the principal of or the interest on such bonds. Expenses incurred by the Authority in carrying out the provisions of this Article may be made payable from funds provided pursuant to this Article and no liability or obligation shall be incurred by the Authority hereunder beyond the extent to which moneys shall have been so provided.

History.

1967, c. 1177.

§ 116-209.13.
Tax exemption.

The exercise of the powers granted by this Article in all respects will be for the benefit of the people of the State, for their well-being and prosperity and for the improvement of their social and economic conditions, and the Authority shall not be required to pay any taxes on any property owned by the Authority under the provisions of this Article or upon the income therefrom, and the bonds issued under the provisions of this Article shall at all times be free from taxation by the State or any local unit or political subdivision or other instrumentality of the State, excepting inheritance or gift taxes, income taxes on the gain from the transfer of the bonds, and franchise taxes. The interest on the bonds is not subject to taxation as income.

History.

1967, c. 1177; 1995, c. 46, s. 9.

§ 116-209.14.
Annual reports.

The Authority shall, following the close of each fiscal year, publish an annual report of its activities for the preceding year to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, the Governor, and the General Assembly. Each report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering the operations of the Authority during the year. The operations of the Authority shall be subject to the oversight of the State Auditor pursuant to Article 5A of Chapter 147 of the General Statutes.

History.

1967, c. 1177; 1979, c. 165, s. 7; 1983, c. 913, s. 20; 2021-180, s. 8A.4(d).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8A.4(d), effective November 18, 2021, inserted “the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina.”

§ 116-209.15.
Merger of trust fund.

The Authority may merge into the Loan Fund the trust fund established pursuant to

G.S. 116-209

hereof and may transfer from such trust fund to the credit of the Loan Fund all money, investments and other assets and resources credited to such trust fund, for application and use in accordance with the provisions of this Article pertaining to the Loan Fund, including the power to pay expenses of the Authority from the Loan Fund to the extent that other funds are not available therefor.

History.

1967, c. 1177.

§ 116-209.16.
Other powers; criteria.

The Authority, in addition to all the powers more specifically vested hereunder, shall have all other powers necessary or convenient to carry out and effectuate the purposes and provisions of this Article, including the power to receive, administer and comply with the conditions and requirements respecting any gift, grant or donation of any property or money, any insurance or guarantee of any student loan or student obligations, any loans, advances, contributions, interest subsidies or any other assistance from any federal or State agency or other entity; to pledge or assign any money, charges, fees or other revenues and any proceeds derived by the Authority from any student loans, obligations, sales of property, insurance or other sources; to borrow money and to issue in evidence thereof revenue bonds of the Authority for the purposes of this Article and to issue revenue refunding bonds; to conduct studies and surveys respecting the needs for financial assistance of residents of the State respecting education beyond the high school level.

In carrying out the powers vested and the responsibilities imposed under this Article, the Authority shall be guided by and shall observe the following criteria and requirements, the determination of the Authority as to compliance with such criteria and requirements being final and conclusive:

Any student loan, grant or other assistance provided by the Authority to any student shall be necessary to enable the student to pursue his education above the high school level; and

No student loan, grant or other financial assistance shall be provided to any student by the Authority except in conformity with the provisions of this Article and to carry out the purposes hereof.

The Authority shall by rules and regulations prescribe other conditions, criteria and requirements that it shall deem necessary or desirable for providing financial assistance to students under this Article upon a fair and equitable basis, giving due regard to the needs and qualifications of the students and to the purposes of this Article.

History.

1971, c. 392, s. 11.

§ 116-209.16A.
Information on career and major options.

Know Before You Go. — The Authority shall provide information on a Web site, under a section entitled “Know Before You Go,” to students and parents to assist in selection of major and career options as provided in this section. The information shall be updated annually.

Career Options. — The Authority shall, as data is available, provide information on projected employment needs in the labor economy and associated salary ranges for those areas of employment, college majors which may fulfill those needs, and institutions of higher education that may provide those majors. The Authority may use existing sources of public information, such as the employment projections produced by the federal Department of Labor, Bureau of Labor Statistics, to develop this information.

Major Options. — The Authority shall, as data is available, provide information based on aggregate data for outcomes of public and private institutions of higher education in North Carolina. Outcome information for each public and private institution of higher education shall include, but is not limited to, the following:

Completion rates within the expected number of semesters for the degree sought.

Transfer rates of students to other institutions.

Percentage of students receiving financial aid, by type of aid.

Average and median amount of loan debt upon student graduation, by major.

Average and median salary, by major.

Percentage of graduates employed within six months of graduation, by major.

Percentage of graduates enrolled in graduate school within six months of graduation, by major.

Public and Private Institutions of Higher Education. — For the purposes of this section, “public institutions of higher education” shall include the constituent institutions of The University of North Carolina and the community colleges under the jurisdiction of the State Board of Community Colleges and “private institutions of higher education” shall include postsecondary institutions that award postsecondary degrees, as defined in G.S. 116-15(a2)(1).

History.

2016-57, s. 1.

§ 116-209.17.
Establishment of student assistance program.

The Authority is authorized, in addition to all other powers and duties vested or imposed under this Article, to establish and administer a statewide student assistance program for the purpose of removing, insofar as may be possible, the financial barriers to education beyond the high school level for eligible needy students at public or private institutions in this State and, with respect to loans, public, and private institutions located elsewhere. This objective shall be accomplished, consistent with Federal law or regulation, through a comprehensive program under which the financial ability of each student and of his family, under standards prescribed by the Authority, is measured against the reasonable costs, as determined by the Authority, of the educational program which the student proposes to pursue. Needs of students for financial assistance shall, to the extent of the availability of funds from federal, State, institutional or other sources, be met through work-study programs, loans, grants and out-of-term employment, or a combination of these forms of assistance. With respect to grants made pursuant to this Article, no student is eligible to receive benefits under this student assistance program for a total of more than 45 months of full-time, post-high school level education.

History.

1971, c. 392, s. 11; 1979, c. 165, s. 8; 1987, c. 227, s. 7.

§ 116-209.18.
Powers of Authority to administer student assistance program.

In order to accomplish the purposes of this Article the Authority is authorized:

To receive from the general fund or other sources such sums as the General Assembly may authorize from time to time for such purposes, and to receive from any other donor, public or private, such sums as may be made available, and to cause such sums to be disbursed for the purposes for which they have been provided;

To establish such criteria as the Authority shall deem necessary or desirable for determining the need of students for grants under this Article, as opposed to other forms of financial assistance, and for deciding who shall receive grants;

To prescribe the form and to regulate the submission of applications for assistance and to prescribe the procedures for considering and approving such applications;

To provide for the making of, and to make, grants under this Article under such terms and conditions as the Authority shall deem advisable;

To encourage educational institutions to increase the resources available for financial assistance; to prescribe such formulas for institutional maintenance of effort as the Authority may determine to be consistent with the purposes of this Article;

To provide by contract for the administration of all or any portion of the student assistance program by nonprofit organizations or corporations, pursuant to regulations and criteria established by the Authority;

To serve, on designation by the Governor, or as may otherwise be provided by federal law, as the State agency to administer such statewide programs of student assistance as shall be established from time to time under federal law; and

To have all other powers and authority necessary to carry out the purposes of the student assistance program, including, without limitation, all the powers given to the Authority by

G.S. 116-204

and by other provisions of the General Statutes.

History.

1971, c. 392, s. 11.

§ 116-209.19.
Grants to students.

The Authority is authorized to make grants to eligible students enrolled or to be enrolled in eligible institutions in North Carolina out of such money as from time to time may be appropriated by the State or as may otherwise be available to the Authority for such grants. The Authority, subject to the provisions of this Article and any applicable appropriation act, shall adopt rules, regulations and procedures for determining the needs of the respective students for grants and for the purpose of making such grants. The amount of any grant made by the Authority to any student, whether enrolled or to be enrolled in any private institution or any tax-supported public institution, shall be determined by the Authority upon the basis of substantially similar standards and guides that shall be set forth in the Authority’s rules, regulations and procedures; provided, however, that grants made in any fiscal year to students enrolled or to be enrolled in private institutions may be increased to compensate, in whole or in part, for the average annual State appropriated tuition subsidy for such fiscal year, determined as provided herein. The average annual State appropriated subsidy for each fiscal year shall be determined by the Secretary of Administration, after consultation with the Board of Governors of the University of North Carolina and the Authority, for each of the two categories of tax-supported institutions, being (i) institutions, presently 16, that provide education of the collegiate grade and grant baccalaureate degrees and (ii) institutions, such as community colleges and technical institutes created and existing under Chapter 115A of the General Statutes and community colleges created and existing under Chapter 115D of the General Statutes. The average annual State appropriated subsidy for each of such two categories of institutions shall mean the amount of the total appropriations of the State for the respective fiscal years under the current operations budgets, pursuant to the State Budget Act reasonably allocable to undergraduate students enrolled in such institutions exclusive of the Division of Health Affairs of the University of North Carolina and the North Carolina School of the Arts, redesignated effective August 1, 2008, as the “University of North Carolina School of the Arts” for all institutions in such category, all as shall be determined by the Secretary of Administration after consultation as above provided, divided by the budgeted number of North Carolina undergraduate students to be enrolled in such fiscal year.

The Authority, in determining the needs of students for grants, may among other factors, give consideration to the amount of other financial assistance that may be available to the students, such as nonrepayable awards under the Pell Grant Program, the Health Professions Education Assistance Act or other student assistance programs created by federal law.

History.

1971, c. 392, s. 11; c. 1244, s. 14; 1975, c. 879, s. 46; 1979,c. 165, s. 9; 1983, c. 717, s. 35; 1985 (Reg. Sess., 1986), c.955, ss. 38, 39; 1987, c. 227, s. 8; c. 564, s. 23; 2006-203, s. 54; 2008-192, s. 9.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-203, s. 54, effective July 1, 2007, and applicable to the budget for the 2007-2009 biennium and each subsequent biennium thereafter, substituted “State Budget Act” for “Executive Budget Act” in the last sentence of the first paragraph; and deleted the former last paragraph, which read: “Prior to taking any action under this subsection, the Secretary of
Administration may consult with the Advisory Budget Commission.”

Session Laws 2008-192, s. 9, effective August 1, 2008, inserted “redesignated effective August 1, 2008, as the ‘University of North Carolina School of the Arts,’ ” near the end of the first paragraph.

§ 116-209.19A.
Limit semesters eligible for need-based grants and scholarships. [Effective until July 1, 2023]

The Authority administers the following need-based grant and scholarship programs: the Education Lottery Scholarships, North Carolina Community College Grant Program, The University of North Carolina Need-Based Financial Aid Program, and Need-Based Scholarships for Students Attending Private Institutions of Higher Education.

G.S. 115C-499.2

A, 115D-40.2, 116-25.1, and 116-281.1 limit the number of semesters that a student may receive a grant or scholarship from any of those programs and also provide the circumstances in which a waiver to those limits may be granted by the appropriate postsecondary institution. The Authority shall enforce these limitations in administering these programs so that unless a waiver is granted by the appropriate postsecondary institution, no student shall receive a grant or scholarship from any of those programs or any combination of those financial aid programs while pursuing a degree, diploma, or certificate for more than any of the following time periods: (i) 10 full-time academic semesters or its equivalent if enrolled part-time or (ii) 12 full-time academic semesters or its equivalent if the student is enrolled in a program officially designated as a five-year degree program.

A postsecondary institution that grants a waiver under

G.S. 115C-499.2

A, 115D-40.2, 116-25.1, or 116-281.1 shall certify the granting of the waiver in a manner acceptable to the Authority and shall also maintain documentation substantiating the reason for the waiver.

History.

2013-360, s. 11.15(g).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8A.2(f), effective July 1, 2023, in the first and second paragraphs, substituted “G.S. 116-209.82 and

G.S. 116-281.1

” for “G.S. 115C-499.2A, 115D-40.2, 116-25.1, and 116-281.1”; and in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “the North Carolina Need Based Scholarship for Public Colleges and Universities” for “the Education Lottery Scholarships, North Carolina Community College Grant Program, The University of North Carolina Need Based Financial Aid Program,” and in the second sentence, “scholarship from these programs” for “scholarship from any of those programs.”

§ 116-209.19A.
Limit semesters eligible for need-based grants and scholarships. [Effective July 1, 2023]

The Authority administers the following need-based grant and scholarship programs: the North Carolina Need-Based Scholarship for Public Colleges and Universities and Need-Based Scholarships for Students Attending Private Institutions of Higher Education.

G.S. 116-209.82

and

G.S. 116-281.1

limit the number of semesters that a student may receive a grant or scholarship from these programs and also provide the circumstances in which a waiver to those limits may be granted by the appropriate postsecondary institution. The Authority shall enforce these limitations in administering these programs so that unless a waiver is granted by the appropriate postsecondary institution, no student shall receive a grant or scholarship from any of those programs or any combination of those financial aid programs while pursuing a degree, diploma, or certificate for more than any of the following time periods: (i) 10 full-time academic semesters or its equivalent if enrolled part-time or (ii) 12 full-time academic semesters or its equivalent if the student is enrolled in a program officially designated as a five-year degree program.

A postsecondary institution that grants a waiver under

G.S. 116-209.82

or

G.S. 116-281.1

shall certify the granting of the waiver in a manner acceptable to the Authority and shall also maintain documentation substantiating the reason for the waiver.

History.

2013-360, s. 11.15(g); 2021-180, s. 8A.2(f).

Editor's Note.

Session Laws
2021-180, s. 1.1, provides: “This act shall be known as the ‘Current Operations Appropriations Act of 2021.’”

Session Laws
2021-180, s.
43.7, is a severability clause.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2021-180, s. 8A.2(f), effective July 1, 2023, in the first and second paragraphs, substituted “G.S. 116-209.82 and

G.S. 116-281.1

” for “G.S. 115C-499.2A, 115D-40.2, 116-25.1, and 116-281.1”; and in the first paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “the North Carolina Need Based Scholarship for Public Colleges and Universities” for “the Education Lottery Scholarships, North Carolina Community College Grant Program, The University of North Carolina Need Based Financial Aid Program,” and in the second sentence, “scholarship from these programs” for “scholarship from any of those programs.”